California statutes. Water Code
Each regional board shall notify each affected city or county, the State Department of Public Health and the Department of Boating and Waterways of areas of inadequate regulation by ordinance of discharges of waste from houseboats and shall recommend provisions necessary to control the discharges of waste from houseboats into the waters.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 288, Sec. 55.   (SB 1169)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13904.

Each affected city or county shall within 120 days of receipt of the notice from the regional board, adopt an ordinance for control of discharges of waste from houseboats within the area for which notice was given by the board. A copy of the ordinance shall be sent to the regional board on its adoption and the regional board shall transmit the ordinance to the state board, the State Department of Public Health and the Department of Boating and Waterways.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 288, Sec. 56.   (SB 1169)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13905.

Such city or county ordinance shall take effect 60 days from the date of adoption by the city or county, unless the regional board holds a public hearing on the matter and determines that the city or county ordinance is not sufficiently restrictive to protect the quality of the waters affected. If the board makes such a determination, it shall so report to the affected city or county and also recommend the ordinance, or modification of the city or county ordinance, which it determines is necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13906.

If a city or county fails to adopt an ordinance controlling discharges of waste from houseboats within 120 days of receipt of the regional board’s notice pursuant to Section 13903, or fails to adopt or modify such ordinance in the manner determined as necessary by the regional board pursuant to Section 13905, within 90 days of receipt of the regional board’s notice, the regional board may adopt regulations necessary for the control of discharges of waste from houseboats for the area designated. Such regional board regulations shall take effect 30 days from the date of their adoption and shall be enforced by the city or county and have the same force and effect as if adopted as a city or county ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13907.

Any action, report, determination, or regulation taken or adopted by a regional board, or any failure of a regional board to act may be reviewed by the state board, and shall be reviewed by the state board on the request of any affected city or county. The state board has all powers as to the review of action or inaction of a regional board under this article as it has to other action or inaction of a regional board, including all powers granted to a regional board to initially determine areas in which discharges of waste from houseboats are inadequately regulated by local ordinance and to adopt regulations when a city or county fails to do so, if the state board finds that appropriate action has not been taken by a regional board. Any action of a regional board under this chapter or any city or county ordinance affected by the review of the state board shall have no force or effect during the period of the review by the state board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 800.)
-------------------------------------------

13908.

No provision in this chapter and no action thereunder by a regional board or the state board is a limitation on the power of a city or county to adopt and enforce additional ordinances or regulations not in conflict therewith imposing further conditions, restrictions, or limitations with respect to the discharges of waste from houseboats.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 11.5. Municipal Wastewater Agencies [13910. - 13915.]

13910.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Fostering regional cooperative efforts to improve water quality and local sustainable water supply is fundamental for developing California’s 21st century water portfolio.

(b) Stormwater capture, treatment, and use as a water supply is increasingly viewed as an innovative opportunity to improve water quality where it is viable and economically feasible.

(c) Municipal wastewater agencies have existing infrastructure, capacity, and expertise that could be used to assist in meeting the state’s water quality and water supply goals when circumstances allow, while allowing wastewater
 agencies to still meet their primary goals of meeting water quality requirements for wastewater discharge and avoiding sanitary sewer overflows. However, in some circumstances municipal wastewater agencies may need explicit legislative authority before they can pursue certain types of projects.

(d) In order to promote regional interagency cooperation, improve the quality of the waters of the state, and make efficient use of publicly owned infrastructure, it would be beneficial if municipal wastewater agencies had the authority to enter into voluntary agreements for stormwater projects in the future, where cost effective and regionally suitable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 241, Sec. 1.   (SB 273)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

13911.

(a) A municipal wastewater agency may enter into agreements with entities responsible for stormwater management, including, but not limited to, municipal, industrial, and commercial stormwater dischargers subject to this division, for the purpose of managing stormwater and dry weather runoff.

(b) A municipal wastewater agency may acquire, construct, expand, operate, maintain, and provide facilities for any of the following purposes:

(1) The diversion of stormwater and dry weather runoff from the stormwater system to the wastewater collection or treatment system.

(2) The management and treatment of stormwater and dry
 weather runoff.

(3) The discharge of treated dry weather runoff and stormwater to the stormwater drainage system or receiving waters.

(4) The beneficial reuse of captured dry weather runoff and stormwater.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 241, Sec. 1.   (SB 273)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

13912.

(a) A municipal wastewater agency may do any of the following:

(1) To the extent permitted by federal law, authorize the discharge of stormwater or dry weather runoff captured at industrial and commercial sites to the wastewater collection or treatment system subject to any requirements that may be imposed by the municipal wastewater agency or public agency that owns and operates the tributary collection system.

(2) In order to carry out the powers granted, and the purposes established, under this chapter, exercise any of the powers otherwise granted to it by law, including, but not limited to, enforcing compliance with local, state, and federal water quality requirements through
 the implementation of the municipal wastewater agency’s industrial pretreatment programs and ensuring that the project or program is consistent with local watershed priorities, obligations, and circumstances.

(3) Levy taxes, fees, and charges consistent with the municipal wastewater agency’s existing authority in order to fund projects undertaken pursuant to this chapter.

(b) The exercise of any new authority granted under this chapter is subject to and shall comply with the Cortese-Knox-Hertzberg Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000 (Division 3 (commencing with Section 56000) of Title 5 of the Government Code). 

(c) (1) If, after January 1, 2022, a municipal wastewater agency enters into a new agreement or amends an agreement pursuant to this chapter, the agency shall, within 30 days
 after the effective date of the new agreement or amendment, file a copy of the agreement or amendment with the local agency formation commission in each county where any part of the municipal wastewater agency’s territory is located.

(2) The local agency formation commission’s approval of an agreement or an amendment to an agreement as described in paragraph (1) shall not be required, except as required by subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 241, Sec. 1.   (SB 273)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

13913.

(a) An agreement, project, or use of authority authorized under this chapter shall be completely voluntary for all participating entities.

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to interfere with any existing programs or projects, authorities, or obligations for municipal wastewater agencies or stormwater dischargers.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter merely to allow local agencies interested in pursuing the types of projects described in this chapter to proceed without additional legislative changes to their authorizing statutes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 241, Sec. 1.   (SB 273)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

13914.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to alter or interfere with any of the following:

(a) Existing water rights to water from any source, including any adjudicated rights allocated by a court judgment or order, including any physical solution, rights issued by the state or a state agency, and rights acquired pursuant to any federal or state statute.

(b) Existing water rights law.

(c) Any rights, remedies, or obligations that may exist pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 1200) or Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 1210) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 2 of this code, Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1700) of Part 2
 of Division 2 of this code, or Chapter 8.5 (commencing with Section 1501) of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 241, Sec. 1.   (SB 273)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

13915.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Dry weather runoff” has the same meaning as defined in Section 10561.5.

(b) “Local agency” includes, but is not limited to, a city, county, special district, joint powers authority, sanitary district, sanitation district, county sanitation
 district, community services district, and municipal utility district.

(c) “Municipal wastewater agency” means a local agency that chooses to exercise any authority granted under this chapter.

(d) “Stormwater” has the same meaning as defined in Section 10561.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 241, Sec. 1.   (SB 273)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 12. Special Water Quality Provisions [13950. - 13952.5.]

13950.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, upon any district in the Lake Tahoe Basin providing in any area of the district a sewer system and treatment facilities sufficient to handle and treat any resultant waste and transportation facilities sufficient to transport any resultant effluent outside the Lake Tahoe Basin, the further maintenance or use of cesspools or other means of waste disposal in such area is a public nuisance and the district shall require all buildings from which waste is discharged to be connected with the sewer system within a period of not less than 90 days from the completion of such system and facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 800.)
-------------------------------------------

13951.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, on or after January 1, 1972, waste from within the Lake Tahoe watershed shall be placed only into a sewer system and treatment facilities sufficient to handle and treat any such waste and transportation facilities sufficient to transport any resultant effluent outside the Lake Tahoe watershed, except that such waste may be placed in a holding tank which is pumped and transported to such treatment and transportation facilities.

As used in this section “waste” shall not include solid waste refuse.

The further maintenance or use of cesspools, septic tanks, or other means of waste disposal in the Lake Tahoe watershed on or after January 1, 1972, by any person, except as permitted pursuant to this section, is a public nuisance. The occupancy of any building from which waste is discharged in violation of this section is a public nuisance, and an action may be brought to enjoin any person from occupying any such building.

This section shall not be applicable to a particular area of the Lake Tahoe watershed whenever the regional board for the Lahontan region finds that the continued operation of septic tanks, cesspools, or other means of waste disposal in such area will not, individually or collectively, directly or indirectly, affect the quality of the waters of Lake Tahoe and that the sewering of such area would have a damaging effect upon the environment.

This section shall not be applicable to any area or areas within the Fallen Leaf Lake watershed in the event the regional board for the Lahontan region finds that with the export of toilet wastes by single-family residences or with the export of toilet and kitchen wastes with respect to any commercial properties, the continued use of septic tanks, cesspools, or other means of waste disposal in such area or areas for the treatment and disposal of the remaining wastes, will not, individually or collectively, directly or indirectly, affect the quality of the waters of Lake Tahoe, and that the sewering of such area or areas would have a damaging effect upon the environment.

This section shall not affect the applicability of Section 13950.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 637.)
-------------------------------------------

13952.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 13950 and 13951, water containing waste which has been placed in a sanitary sewer system for treatment and transportation outside of the Lake Tahoe Basin may be reclaimed in a pilot reclamation project to demonstrate the technological and environmental feasibility of using such water for beneficial purposes within the Lake Tahoe Basin in accordance with the provisions of the Water Reclamation Law (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 13500) of this division) and the provisions of this section.

Prior to the initiation of any pilot reclamation project within the Lake Tahoe Basin, the reclaimer or reuser shall submit the project with technical data to the regional board for the Lahontan region for approval. Only those projects submitted before January 1, 1984, shall be considered. The technical data submitted shall demonstrate that such pilot reclamation project will not, individually or collectively, directly or indirectly, adversely affect the quality of the waters of Lake Tahoe. The intended operational life of the project shall be at least 10 years.

No pilot reclamation project shall be initiated unless and until such regional board approves the project, and finds that such pilot reclamation project or projects will not, individually or collectively, directly or indirectly, adversely affect the quality of the waters of Lake Tahoe. The regional board for the Lahontan region shall place conditions on any approved project to include specification of maximum project size. The regional board for the Lahontan region may suspend or terminate an approved project for cause at any time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

13952.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 13951, the South Tahoe Public Utility District may provide recycled water only to prevent the destruction of its Luther Pass recycled water pump station from a catastrophic fire if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The district submits an engineering report to the Lahontan Regional Board and the State Department of Public Health, as required by that regional board and that department.

(2) The Lahontan Regional Board, the State Department of Public Health, and the Tahoe Regional Planning Agency authorize the use of recycled water, and the specified area or areas in the immediate
 vicinity of the pump station where that recycled water may be used, only to prevent the destruction of the district’s Luther Pass recycled water pump station from a catastrophic fire.

(3) The fire incident commander authorizes the use of the recycled water to prevent the destruction of the district’s Luther Pass recycled water pump station from a catastrophic fire, as authorized pursuant to this section.

(b) For purposes of this section, “catastrophic fire” means a condition exists that will result in severe harm to life, property, and the environment if the use of recycled water as authorized pursuant to this section is not used, and all other methods to extinguish the fire have been exhausted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 288, Sec. 57.   (SB 1169)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13952.5.

The declared statewide interest in the preservation of Lake Tahoe, and the state and federal actions mandating the transportation of treated sewage effluent out of the Lake Tahoe watershed, requires that the law relating to the authority for prescribing waste discharge requirements for the effluent, and requirements pertaining to the storage of the effluent, the receiving waters, and the disposal areas, be clarified, and that law is hereby clarified and confirmed, to provide that, notwithstanding Section 13002 or any other provision of law, the regional board for the Lahontan region has exclusive authority to prescribe, under existing law, waste discharge requirements for treated sewage effluent transported out of the Lake Tahoe watershed to Alpine County within the Lahontan region, including requirements pertaining to the storage of the effluent, the receiving waters, and the disposal areas in Alpine County within the Lahontan region. However, any such action by that regional board is subject to review as provided in Sections 13320 and 13330.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 447, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 12.2. San Joaquin Valley Agricultural Drain [13953. - 13953.4.]

13953.

There shall be no discharge from a San Joaquin Valley agricultural drain to the Delta, Suisun Bay, or Carquinez Straits until the requirements of this division and the Federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.) are satisfied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 33, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

13953.1.

There shall be no discharge from a San Joaquin Valley drain into Monterey Bay or tributaries draining into Monterey Bay.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 33, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

13953.2.

If a San Joaquin Valley agricultural drain, including the drainage facility authorized as part of the San Luis Unit of the federal Central Valley Project, is constructed and discharges to the Delta, Suisun Bay, or Carquinez Straits, the state board shall permit the discharge pursuant to this division only if the state board finds that the following additional requirements are satisfied:

(a) The discharge of the drain, which is to carry only subsurface agricultural drainage effluent, shall be located and shall discharge at rates of flow to protect the beneficial uses of the Delta, Suisun Marsh, and the bays westerly to the Golden Gate. If it is determined to be in the public interest to provide a substitute water supply to water users in lieu of modifying the operation or changing the discharge point of the drain, no added financial burden shall be placed on the water users solely by virtue of that substitution.

(b) The drainage facility shall include built-in operational flexibility, control, and treatment to protect the beneficial uses of the Delta, Suisun Marsh, and the bays westerly to the Golden Gate.

(c) There is established an acceptable comprehensive monitoring program prior to and during the operation of the drain to determine the impact of the discharge effluent, if any, on the Delta, Suisun Marsh, and the bays westerly to the Golden Gate.

(d) A program has been developed, funded, and initiated to evaluate the feasibility of using drain water to establish wetland habitat capable of producing wintering waterfowl food supplies.

(e) The repayment schedule for the drain takes into account the following:

(1) The quantity of effluent discharged into the drain by the discharger.

(2) The concentration of salts in the effluent of the discharger.

(3) The distance the effluent of the discharger is carried in the drain.

(4) The quantity of water applied in the areas contributing to the drainage problem.

(f) There is an enforceable provision in the permit that any surface or subsurface effluent leakage shall be confined within the drainage facility right-of-way, and that in the event that this condition is violated the drainage facility shall not be operated until the leakage is stopped.

(g) The alignment of the drainage facility, to the extent feasible, shall be designed to minimize severance and access problems to land, roadways, and other facilities along the right-of-way.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 33, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

13953.3.

Subsurface drainage effluent may be made available for any beneficial uses for which it is suitable, including, but not limited to, industrial uses, powerplant cooling, energy development, enhancement of fish and wildlife resources, and irrigation. These programs may reduce the demands for new fresh water supplies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 33, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

13953.4.

It is the intent of the Legislature that, to the extent feasible, features for the enhancement of fish and wildlife resources shall be incorporated into the drain. The state’s participation in the drain shall be subject to the Davis-Dolwig Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 11900) of Part 3 of Division 10).

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 33, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 12.5. Clean Water and Water Conservation Bond Law of 1978 [13955. - 13969.]

13955.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Clean Water and Water Conservation Bond Law of 1978.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1160.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the June 6, 1978, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13956.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that clean water, which fosters the health of the people, the beauty of their environment, the expansion of industry and agriculture, the enhancement of fish and wildlife, the improvement of recreational facilities and the provision of pure drinking water at a reasonable cost, is an essential public need. However, because the State of California is subject to great fluctuations in precipitation which have created semiarid and arid conditions in many parts of the state, and because the state has historically experienced a dry year on the average once every fourth year and has occasionally experienced such dry years consecutively resulting in conditions of drought, it is of paramount importance that the limited water resources of the state be preserved and protected from pollution and degradation in order to ensure continued economic, community, and social growth. Although the State of California is endowed with abundant lakes and ponds, streams and rivers, and hundreds of miles of shoreline, as well as large quantities of underground water, these vast water resources are threatened by pollution, which, if not checked, will impede the state’s economic, community and social growth. The chief cause of pollution is the discharge of inadequately treated waste into the waters of the state. Many public agencies have not met the demands for adequate waste treatment or the control of water pollution because of inadequate financial resources and other responsibilities. Increasing population accompanied by accelerating urbanization, growing demands for water of high quality, rising costs of construction and technological changes mean that unless the state acts now the needs may soar beyond the means available for public finance. Meeting these needs is a proper purpose of the federal, state and local governments. Local agencies, by reason of their closeness to the problem, should continue to have primary responsibility for construction, operation and maintenance of the facilities necessary to cleanse our waters. Since water pollution knows no political boundaries and since the cost of eliminating the existing backlog of needed facilities and of providing additional facilities for future needs will be beyond the ability of local agencies to pay, the state, to meet its responsibility to protect and promote the health, safety and welfare of the inhabitants of the state, should assist in the financing. The federal government is contributing to the cost of control of water pollution, and just provision should be made to cooperate with the United States of America.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1160.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the June 6, 1978, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13956.5.

The Legislature further finds and declares that the people of the state have a primary interest in the development and implementation of programs, devices, and systems to conserve water so as to make more efficient use of existing water supplies and to reclaim wastewater in order to supplement present surface and underground water supplies. Utilization of reclaimed water and water which has otherwise been conserved will economically benefit the people of the state, will augment the existing water supplies of many local communities, and will assist in meeting future water requirements of the state. It is therefore further intended by the Legislature that the state undertake all appropriate steps to encourage and develop water conservation and reclamation so that such water may be made available to help meet the growing water requirements of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1160.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the June 6, 1978, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13957.

It is the intent of this chapter to provide necessary funds to insure the full participation by the state under the provisions of Title II of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act (33 U.S.C. 1251 et seq.) and acts amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto, and to provide funds for state participation in the financing of projects, for the control of water pollution, or for the development of water conservation and wastewater reclamation, which are ineligible for federal assistance under Title II of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act and acts amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1160.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the June 6, 1978, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13958.

The State General Obligation Bond Law is adopted for the purpose of the issuance, sale and repayment of, and otherwise providing with respect to, the bonds authorized to be issued by this chapter, and the provisions of that law are included in this chapter as though set out in full in this chapter except that, notwithstanding anything in the State General Obligation Bond Law, the maximum maturity of the bonds shall not exceed 50 years from the date of each respective series. The maturity of each respective series shall be calculated from the date of such series.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1160.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the June 6, 1978, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13959.

As used in this chapter, and for the purposes of this chapter as used in the State General Obligation Bond Law, the following words shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Committee” means the Clean Water and Water Conservation Finance Committee created by Section 13960.

(b) “Board” means the State Water Resources Control Board.

(c) “Fund” means the State Clean Water and Water Conservation Fund.

(d) “Municipality” shall have the same meaning as in the Federal Water Pollution Control Act (33 U.S.C. 1251 et seq.) and acts amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto and shall also include the state or any agency, department, or political subdivision thereof.

(e) “Treatment works” shall have the same meaning as in the Federal Water Pollution Control Act (33 U.S.C. 1251 et seq.) and acts amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto, and shall also include such additional devices and systems as are necessary and proper to control water pollution, reclaim wastewater, or reduce use of and otherwise conserve water.

(f) “Construction” means any one or more of the following: preliminary planning to determine the feasibility of treatment works, engineering, architectural, legal, fiscal, or economic investigations or studies, surveys, designs, plans, working drawings, specifications, procedures, or other necessary actions, erection, building, acquisition, alteration, remodeling, improvement, or extension of treatment works, or the inspection or supervision of any of the foregoing items.

(g) “Eligible project” means a project for the construction of treatment works which is all of the following:

(1) Eligible for federal assistance, whether or not federal funds are then available therefor;

(2) Necessary to prevent water pollution;

(3) Certified by the board as entitled to priority over other treatment works, and which complies with applicable water quality standards, policies and plans. 

(h) “Eligible state assisted project” means a project for the construction of treatment works which is all of the following:

(1) Ineligible for federal assistance.

(2) Necessary to prevent water pollution or feasible and cost effective for conservation or reclamation of water.

(3) Certified by the board as entitled to priority over other treatment works and which complies with applicable water quality and other applicable federal or state standards, policies, and plans.

(i) “Federal assistance” means funds available to a municipality either directly or through allocation by the state, from the federal government as grants for construction of treatment works, pursuant to Title II of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, and acts amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1160.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the June 6, 1978, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13959.5.

There is in the State Treasury the State Clean Water and Water Conservation Fund, which fund is hereby created.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1160.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the June 6, 1978, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13960.

The Clean Water and Water Conservation Finance Committee is hereby created. The committee shall consist of the Governor or his designated representative, the State Controller, the State Treasurer, the Director of Finance, and the chairman of the board. The executive officer of the board shall serve as a member of the committee in the absence of the chairman. Said committee shall be the “committee” as that term is used in the State General Obligation Bond Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1160.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the June 6, 1978, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13961.

The committee is hereby authorized and empowered to create a debt or debts, liability or liabilities, of the State of California, in the aggregate amount of three hundred seventy-five million dollars ($375,000,000), in the manner provided in this chapter. Such debt or debts, liability or liabilities, shall be created for the purpose of providing the fund to be used for the object and work specified in Section 13962.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1160.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the June 6, 1978, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13962.

(a) The moneys in the fund shall be used for the purposes set forth in this section.

(b) The board is authorized to enter into contracts with municipalities having authority to construct, operate and maintain treatment works, for grants to such municipalities to aid in the construction of eligible projects.

Grants may be made pursuant to this section to reimburse municipalities for the state share of construction costs for eligible projects which received federal assistance but which did not receive an appropriate state grant due solely to depletion of the fund created pursuant to the Clean Water Bond Law of 1974; provided, however, that eligibility for reimbursement under this section is limited to the actual construction capital costs incurred.

Any contract pursuant to this section may include such provisions as may be agreed upon by the parties thereto, and any such contract concerning an eligible project shall include, in substance, the following provisions:

(1) An estimate of the reasonable cost of the eligible project;

(2) An agreement by the board to pay to the municipality, during the progress of constuction or following completion of construction as may be agreed upon by the parties, an amount which equals at least 1212 percent of the eligible project cost determined pursuant to federal and state laws and regulations;

(3) An agreement by the municipality, (i) to proceed expeditiously with, and complete, the eligible project, (ii) to commence operation of the treatment works on completion thereof, and to properly operate and maintain such works in accordance with applicable provisions of law, (iii) to apply for and make reasonable efforts to secure federal assistance for the eligible project, (iv) to secure the approval of the board before applying for federal assistance in order to maximize the amounts of such assistance received or to be received for all eligible projects in the state, and (v) to provide for payment of the municipality’s share of the cost of the eligible project.

(c) In addition to the powers set forth in subdivision (b) of this section, the board is authorized to enter into contracts with municipalities for grants for eligible state assisted projects.

Any contract for an eligible state assisted project pursuant to this section may include such provisions as may be agreed upon by the parties thereto, provided, however, that the amount of moneys which may be granted or otherwise committed to municipalities for such projects shall not exceed fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) in the aggregate.

Any contract concerning an eligible state assisted project shall include, in substance, the following provisions:

(1) An estimate of the reasonable cost of the eligible state assisted project; 

(2) An agreement by the board to pay to the municipality, during the progress of construction or following completion of construction, as may be agreed upon by the parties, an amount which at least equals the local share of the cost of construction of such projects as determined pursuant to applicable federal and state laws and regulations;

(3) An agreement by the municipality (i) to proceed expeditiously with, and complete, such project, (ii) to commence operation of such project on completion thereof, and to properly operate and maintain such project in accordance with applicable provisions of law, (iii) to provide for payment of the municipality’s share of the cost of such project (iv) if appropriate, to apply for and make reasonable efforts to secure federal assistance, other than that available pursuant to Title II of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, for such project and to secure the approval of the board before applying for federal assistance in order to maximize the amounts of such assistance received or to be received for all eligible state assisted projects.

(d) The board may make direct grants to any municipality or by contract or otherwise undertake plans, surveys, research, development and studies necessary, convenient or desirable to the effectuation of the purposes and powers of the board pursuant to this division and to prepare recommendations with regard thereto, including the preparation of comprehensive statewide or areawide studies and reports on the collection, treatment and disposal of waste under a comprehensive cooperative plan.

(e) The board may from time to time with the approval of the committee transfer moneys in the fund to the State Water Quality Control Fund to be available for loans to public agencies pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 13400) of this division.

(f) As much of the moneys in the fund as is necessary shall be used to reimburse the General Obiligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724. 5 of the Government Code.

(g) The board may adopt rules and regulations governing the making and enforcing of contracts pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1160.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the June 6, 1978, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13963.

All bonds herein authorized, which shall have been duly sold and delivered as herein provided, shall constitute valid and legally binding general obligations of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal and interest thereon.

There shall be collected annually in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected such a sum, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, as shall be required to pay the principal and interest on said bonds as herein provided, and it is hereby made the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of said revenue, to do and perform each and every act which shall be necessary to collect said additional sum. 

All money deposited in the fund which has been derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1160.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the June 6, 1978, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13964.

All money deposited in the fund pursuant to any provision of law requiring repayments to the state for assistance financed by the proceeds of the bonds authorized by this chapter shall be available for transfer to the General Fund. When transferred to the General Fund such money shall be applied as a reimbursement to the General Fund on account of principal and interest on the bonds which has been paid from the General Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1160.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the June 6, 1978, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13965.

There is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury for the purpose of this chapter such an amount as will equal the following:

(a) Such sum annually as will be necessary to pay the principal of and the interest on the bonds issued and sold pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, as said principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) Such sum as is necessary to carry out the provisions of Section 13966, which sum is appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1160.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the June 6, 1978, election.)
-------------------------------------------

13966.
